Washington statutes.
RCW 18.96.100

Reciprocity.

(1) The director may, upon receipt of the current licensure fee, grant a certificate of licensure to an applicant who is a licensed landscape architect in another state or territory of the United States, the District of Columbia, or another country, if that individual's qualifications and experience are determined by the board to be equivalent to the qualifications and experience required of a person licensed under RCW 18.96.070.

(2) A landscape architect licensed or registered in any other jurisdiction recognized by the board may offer to practice landscape architecture in this state if:

(a) It is clearly and prominently stated in any such offer that the landscape architect is not licensed to practice landscape architecture in Washington state; and

(b) Before practicing landscape architecture or signing a contract to provide landscape architectural services, the landscape architect obtains a certificate of licensure.

[ 2009 c 370 s 10; 1993 c 35 s 4; 1985 c 7 s 75; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 86; 1969 ex.s. c 158 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 370 ss 1-16, 18, 20, and 21: See note following RCW 18.96.010.

Finding—2009 c 370: See note following RCW 18.96.010.